Ohio, session 136, SB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2305.111 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2305.111. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Childhood sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes any of the violations identified in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section and would constitute a criminal offense under the specified section of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation a child under eighteen years of age or a child with a developmental disability or physical impairment under twenty-one years of age. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be childhood sexual abuse for purposes of this division. This division applies to any of the following violations committed in the following specified circumstances: (a) A violation of section 2907.02 or section 2907.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of section 2907.05 or 2907.06 of the Revised Code if, at the time of the violation, any of the following apply: (i) The actor is the victim's natural parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent or the guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of the victim. (ii) The victim is in custody of law or a patient in a hospital or other institution, and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over the victim. (iii) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in a school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code, the victim is enrolled in or attends that school, and the actor is not enrolled in and does not attend that school. (iv) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in an institution of higher education, and the victim is enrolled in or attends that institution. (v) The actor is the victim's athletic or other type of coach, is the victim's instructor, is the leader of a scouting troop of which the victim is a member, or is a person with temporary or occasional disciplinary control over the victim. (vi) The actor is a mental health professional, the victim is a mental health client or patient of the actor, and the actor induces the victim to submit by falsely representing to the victim that the sexual contact involved in the violation is necessary for mental health treatment purposes. (vii) The actor is a licensed medical professional, the victim is a patient of the actor, and the sexual contact occurs in the course of medical treatment. (viii) The victim is confined in a detention facility, and the actor is an employee of that detention facility. (ix) The actor is a cleric, and the victim is a member of, or attends, the church or congregation served by the cleric. (2) "Cleric" has the same meaning as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Licensed medical professional" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Mental health client or patient" has the same meaning as in section 2305.51 of the Revised Code. (5) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code. (6) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Victim" means, except as provided in division (B) of this section, a victim of childhood sexual abuse. (B) Except as provided in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code and subject to division (C) of this section, an action for assault or battery shall be brought within one year, or within five years for an action against an individual who allegedly committed conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, after the cause of the action accrues. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery or conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code accrues upon the later of the following: (1) The date on which the alleged assault or battery occurred; (2) If the plaintiff did not know the identity of the person who allegedly committed the assault or battery or conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code on the date on which it allegedly occurred, the earlier of the following dates: (a) The date on which the plaintiff learns the identity of that person; (b) The date on which, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, the plaintiff should have learned the identity of that person. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, shall be brought within twelve years after the cause of action accrues. If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse that occurs on or after August 3, 2006, has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts. (2) Only for purposes of making claims against a bankruptcy estate of an organization chartered under part B of subtitle II of Title 36 of the United States Code, an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, may be brought at any time after the cause of action accrues. (3) For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery based on childhood sexual abuse, or a cause of action for a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, accrues upon the date on which the victim reaches the age of majority. Section 2. That existing section 2305.111 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. That the version of section 2305.111 of the Revised Code that is scheduled to take effect October 12, 2028, be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2305.111. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Childhood sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes any of the violations identified in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section and would constitute a criminal offense under the specified section of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation a child under eighteen years of age or a child with a developmental disability or physical impairment under twenty-one years of age. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be childhood sexual abuse for purposes of this division. This division applies to any of the following violations committed in the following specified circumstances: (a) A violation of section 2907.02 or section 2907.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of section 2907.05 or 2907.06 of the Revised Code if, at the time of the violation, any of the following apply: (i) The actor is the victim's natural parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent or the guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of the victim. (ii) The victim is in custody of law or a patient in a hospital or other institution, and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over the victim. (iii) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in a school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code, the victim is enrolled in or attends that school, and the actor is not enrolled in and does not attend that school. (iv) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in an institution of higher education, and the victim is enrolled in or attends that institution. (v) The actor is the victim's athletic or other type of coach, is the victim's instructor, is the leader of a scouting troop of which the victim is a member, or is a person with temporary or occasional disciplinary control over the victim. (vi) The actor is a mental health professional, the victim is a mental health client or patient of the actor, and the actor induces the victim to submit by falsely representing to the victim that the sexual contact involved in the violation is necessary for mental health treatment purposes. (vii) The actor is a licensed medical professional, the victim is a patient of the actor, and the sexual contact occurs in the course of medical treatment. (viii) The victim is confined in a detention facility, and the actor is an employee of that detention facility. (ix) The actor is a cleric, and the victim is a member of, or attends, the church or congregation served by the cleric. (2) "Cleric" has the same meaning as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Licensed medical professional" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Mental health client or patient" has the same meaning as in section 2305.51 of the Revised Code. (5) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code. (6) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Victim" means, except as provided in division (B) of this section, a victim of childhood sexual abuse. (B) Except as provided in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code and subject to division (C) of this section, an action for assault or battery shall be brought within one year, or within five years for an action against an individual who allegedly committed conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, after the cause of the action accrues. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery or conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code accrues upon the later of the following: (1) The date on which the alleged assault or battery occurred; (2) If the plaintiff did not know the identity of the person who allegedly committed the assault or battery or conduct prohibited by Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code on the date on which it allegedly occurred, the earlier of the following dates: (a) The date on which the plaintiff learns the identity of that person; (b) The date on which, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, the plaintiff should have learned the identity of that person. (C) An action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, shall be brought within twelve years after the cause of action accrues. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery based on childhood sexual abuse, or a cause of action for a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, accrues upon the date on which the victim reaches the age of majority. If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse that occurs on or after August 3, 2006, has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts. Section 4. That the existing version of section 2305.111 of the Revised Code that is scheduled to take effect October 12, 2028, is hereby repealed. Section 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect on October 12, 2028.